District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

6-1072

Neighborhood Investment Program.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-131, § 3, 51 DCR 1797
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 15, 52 DCR 2638
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 43, 59 DCR 6190
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 9017(a), 61 DCR 9990

Section References

This section is referenced in § 6-1071.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-354, in subsec. (c), validated a previously made technical correction.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 substituted “Department of General Services” for “Office of Property Management” in (d).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see §§ 9017(a) and 9029 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see §§ 9017(a) and 9029 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see §§ 9017(a) and 9029 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).

Resolutions

Resolution 17-878—17-886, the “National Investment Plan”, was approved effective December 2, 2008.

Resolution 17-939, the “Brightwood and Upper Georgia Avenue Neighborhood Investment Plan Emergency Approval Resolution”, was approved effective December 16, 2008.

Resolution 17-941, the “Washington Highlands Neighborhood Investment Plan Emergency Approval Resolution of 2008”, was approved effective December 16, 2008.

Resolution 18-193, the “Bellevue Neighborhood Investment Plan Approval Resolution of 2009”, was approved effective June 30, 2009.

Editor's Notes

Section 9029 of D.C. Law 20-155 provided that the repeal by § 9017(a) of the act shall apply as of September 30, 2014.